Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Revision of title. —

Chapter 62, Laws 1982, revised titles 9, 16 and 25, generally amending, renumbering and repealing the general provisions thereof. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1982 act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in these titles, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in these titles.

For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Section 5, ch. 62, Laws 1982, reads: “This act is effective January 1, 1983.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, application and effect of Civil Rights of Institutionalized Persons Act, 42 USC §§ 1997 to 1997j, 93 ALR Fed 706.